tables/da-dk-g28_93.ctb
nofor before wordlimit begword derefter 23456-1356
nofor before wordlimit begword derst =
nofor before wordlimit begword deres 256
nofor before wordlimit begword derfor 23456-124
nofor before wordlimit begword derf =
nofor before wordlimit begword derigennem 23456-24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword derige 1456-1235-24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword dermed 23456-134
nofor before wordlimit begword derm =
nofor before wordlimit begword derned 23456-1246
nofor before wordlimit begword derne =
nofor before wordlimit begword derop 23456-135
nofor before wordlimit begword dero =
nofor before wordlimit begword derover 23456-1346
nofor before wordlimit begword deror =
nofor before wordlimit begword derpå 23456-1234
nofor before wordlimit begword derp =
nofor before wordlimit begword dersom 23456-234
nofor before wordlimit begword ders =
nofor before wordlimit begword dertil 23456-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword dert =
nofor before wordlimit begword derunder 23456-12345
nofor before wordlimit begword derved 23456-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword din 145-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword disse 145-234
nofor before wordlimit begword dit 145-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword du 145

nofor before wordlimit begword efter 1356
nofor before wordlimit begword eller 15
nofor before wordlimit begword endnu 15-136

nofor before wordlimit begword fik 124-13
nofor before wordlimit begword fordi 124-145
nofor before wordlimit begword forskellige 124-123456-15
nofor before wordlimit begword fske =
nofor before wordlimit begword forskelligt 124-123456-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword fskt =
nofor before wordlimit begword forskellig 124-123456
nofor before wordlimit begword fsk =
nofor before wordlimit begword for 124
nofor before wordlimit begword fra 235
nofor before wordlimit begword første 124-1356-15
nofor before wordlimit begword først 124-1356
nofor before wordlimit begword før 246

nofor before wordlimit begword ganske 1245-123456
nofor before wordlimit begword gennem 12456
nofor before wordlimit begword ge =
nofor before wordlimit begword gik 1245-13
nofor before wordlimit begword gør 1245

nofor before wordlimit begword ham 236
nofor before wordlimit begword hans 13456-234
nofor before wordlimit begword han 13456
nofor before wordlimit begword har 125
nofor before wordlimit begword havde 125-1456
nofor before wordlimit begword hde =
nofor before wordlimit begword have 125-3456
nofor before wordlimit begword hve =
nofor before wordlimit begword helt 125-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword hendes 125-234
nofor before wordlimit begword hende 125-145
nofor before wordlimit begword hun 136
nofor before wordlimit begword hvad 2456
nofor before wordlimit begword hv =
nofor before wordlimit begword hvis 2456-234
nofor before wordlimit begword hvs =
nofor before wordlimit begword hvordan 34-1
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorefter 34-1356
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorfor 34-124
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorigennem 34-24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorledes 34-15
nofor before wordlimit begword hvormed 34-134
nofor before wordlimit begword hvornår 34-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorover 34-1346
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorpå 34-1234
nofor before wordlimit begword hvortil 34-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorunder 34-12345
nofor before wordlimit begword hvorved 34-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword hvor 34

nofor before wordlimit begword igennem 24-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword ige =
nofor before wordlimit begword igen 35
nofor before wordlimit begword ig =
nofor before wordlimit begword ikke 24-13
nofor before wordlimit begword imidlertid 24-24

nofor before wordlimit begword jeg 245

nofor before wordlimit begword kan 13
nofor before wordlimit begword kommer 13-156
nofor before wordlimit begword ker =
nofor before wordlimit begword kommet 13-346
nofor before wordlimit begword ket =
nofor before wordlimit begword komme 13-146
nofor before wordlimit begword kme =
nofor before wordlimit begword kom 13-134
nofor before wordlimit begword kunne 13-1246
nofor before wordlimit begword kne =

nofor before wordlimit begword ligesom 123-234
nofor before wordlimit begword lige 123
nofor before wordlimit begword lille 123-123

nofor before wordlimit begword mange 134-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword mge =
nofor before wordlimit begword med 134
nofor before wordlimit begword megen 146-126
nofor before wordlimit begword meen =
nofor before wordlimit begword meget 146-346
nofor before wordlimit begword meet =
nofor before wordlimit begword mellem 146-134
nofor before wordlimit begword mem =
nofor before wordlimit begword men 146
nofor before wordlimit begword me =
nofor before wordlimit begword min 134-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword mit 134-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword måske 134-123456
nofor before wordlimit begword msk =
nofor before wordlimit begword måtte 134-1256
nofor before wordlimit begword mte =

nofor before wordlimit begword naturligvis 1345-2345-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword nd =
nofor before wordlimit begword ned 1246
nofor before wordlimit begword ne =
nofor before wordlimit begword nogen 1345-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword noget 1345-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword nogle 1345-123-15
nofor before wordlimit begword når 1345

nofor before wordlimit begword også 14-16
nofor before wordlimit begword og 14
nofor before wordlimit begword omkring 135-134-13
nofor before wordlimit begword op 135
nofor before wordlimit begword or =
nofor before wordlimit begword over 1346

nofor before wordlimit begword på 1234

nofor before wordlimit begword ret 12356
nofor before wordlimit begword re 1235-15
nofor before wordlimit begword rigtige 1235-12456
nofor before wordlimit begword rge =
nofor before wordlimit begword rigtigt 1235-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword rigtig 1235

nofor before wordlimit begword sagde 234-1456
nofor before wordlimit begword sammen 234-134
nofor before wordlimit begword samme 234-146
nofor before wordlimit begword sme =
nofor before wordlimit begword selvfølgelig 234-1236-124
nofor before wordlimit begword selv 234-1236
nofor before wordlimit begword sidste 234-1356-15
nofor before wordlimit begword sste =
nofor before wordlimit begword sidst 234-1356
nofor before wordlimit begword sst =
nofor before wordlimit begword sin 234-1345
nofor before wordlimit begword sit 234-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword skal 123456
nofor before wordlimit begword sk =
nofor before wordlimit begword skulle 123456-123-15
nofor before wordlimit begword skle =
nofor before wordlimit begword snart 234-1235
nofor before wordlimit begword som 234
nofor before wordlimit begword sådan 16-1
nofor before wordlimit begword således 16-15
nofor before wordlimit begword så 16

nofor before wordlimit begword tid 2345-145
nofor before wordlimit begword tilbage 2345-12
nofor before wordlimit begword til 2345

nofor before wordlimit begword under 12345

nofor before wordlimit begword var- =
nofor before wordlimit begword var 36
nofor before wordlimit begword ved 1236
nofor before wordlimit begword ville 1236-123-15
nofor before wordlimit begword vil 1236-123
nofor before wordlimit begword været 1236-2345
nofor before wordlimit begword være 345

# Problems solved with pass 2

# Convert the fake "space hyphen" back to a normal hyphen.
noback pass2 @ef @368

### Multi-pass opcodes for converting the virtual capsletter sign @f into dot 7.

# Most of these lines are temporary.
# They will be written with a few swap sets when the swapdd opcode has been fixed.


# Generic forward convert of @f-... to @...7
noback pass2 @f-235 @2357
# Conversion with letsign.
noback pass2 @f-6-235 @6-2357
# Conversion with dot 5, which is used for accent marker in higher unicode pages.
noback pass2 @f-5-235 @5-2357
# Generic backward conversion.
nofor pass2 @2357 @f-235
# Conversion with dot 5 (letsign is handled below).
nofor pass2 @5-2357 @f-5-235

# Same for the following characters.

noback pass2 @f-35 @357
noback pass2 @f-6-35 @6-357
noback pass2 @f-5-35 @5-357
nofor pass2 @357 @f-35
nofor pass2 @5-357 @f-5-35

noback pass2 @f-36 @367
noback pass2 @f-6-36 @6-367
noback pass2 @f-5-36 @5-367
nofor pass2 @367 @f-36
nofor pass2 @5-367 @f-5-36

noback pass2 @f-1 @17
noback pass2 @f-6-1 @6-17
noback pass2 @f-5-1 @5-17
nofor pass2 @17 @f-1
nofor pass2 @5-17 @f-5-1
nofor pass2 @458-17 @f-458-1
nofor pass2 @458-5-17 @f-458-5-1

noback pass2 @f-12 @127
noback pass2 @f-6-12 @6-127
noback pass2 @f-5-12 @5-127
nofor pass2 @127 @f-12
nofor pass2 @5-127 @f-5-12
nofor pass2 @458-127 @f-458-12

noback pass2 @f-14 @147
noback pass2 @f-6-14 @6-147
noback pass2 @f-5-14 @5-147
nofor pass2 @147 @f-14
nofor pass2 @5-147 @f-5-14
nofor pass2 @458-147 @f-458-14

noback pass2 @f-145 @1457
noback pass2 @f-6-145 @6-1457
noback pass2 @f-5-145 @5-1457
nofor pass2 @1457 @f-145
nofor pass2 @5-1457 @f-5-145
nofor pass2 @458-1457 @f-458-145

noback pass2 @f-15 @157
noback pass2 @f-6-15 @6-157
noback pass2 @f-5-15 @5-157
nofor pass2 @157 @f-15
nofor pass2 @5-157 @f-5-15
nofor pass2 @458-157 @f-458-15
nofor pass2 @458-5-157 @f-458-5-15

noback pass2 @f-124 @1247
noback pass2 @f-6-124 @6-1247
noback pass2 @f-5-124 @5-1247
nofor pass2 @1247 @f-124
nofor pass2 @5-1247 @f-5-124
nofor pass2 @458-1247 @f-458-124

noback pass2 @f-1245 @12457
noback pass2 @f-6-1245 @6-12457
noback pass2 @f-5-1245 @5-12457
nofor pass2 @12457 @f-1245
nofor pass2 @5-12457 @f-5-1245
nofor pass2 @458-12457 @f-458-1245

noback pass2 @f-125 @1257
noback pass2 @f-6-125 @6-1257
noback pass2 @f-5-125 @5-1257
nofor pass2 @1257 @f-125
nofor pass2 @5-1257 @f-5-125

noback pass2 @f-24 @247
noback pass2 @f-6-24 @6-247
noback pass2 @f-5-24 @5-247
nofor pass2 @247 @f-24
nofor pass2 @5-247 @f-5-24
nofor pass2 @458-247 @f-458-24
nofor pass2 @458-5-247 @f-458-5-24

noback pass2 @f-245 @2457
noback pass2 @f-6-245 @6-2457
noback pass2 @f-5-245 @5-2457
nofor pass2 @2457 @f-245
nofor pass2 @5-2457 @f-5-245

noback pass2 @f-13 @137
noback pass2 @f-6-13 @6-137
noback pass2 @f-5-13 @5-137
nofor pass2 @137 @f-13
nofor pass2 @5-137 @f-5-13
nofor pass2 @458-137 @f-458-13

noback pass2 @f-123 @1237
noback pass2 @f-6-123 @6-1237
noback pass2 @f-5-123 @5-1237
nofor pass2 @1237 @f-123
nofor pass2 @5-1237 @f-5-123
nofor pass2 @458-1237 @f-458-123

noback pass2 @f-134 @1347
noback pass2 @f-6-134 @6-1347
noback pass2 @f-5-134 @5-1347
nofor pass2 @1347 @f-134
nofor pass2 @5-1347 @f-5-134
nofor pass2 @458-1347 @f-458-134

noback pass2 @f-1345 @13457
noback pass2 @f-6-1345 @6-13457
noback pass2 @f-5-1345 @5-13457
nofor pass2 @13457 @f-1345
nofor pass2 @5-13457 @f-5-1345
nofor pass2 @458-13457 @f-458-1345

noback pass2 @f-135 @1357
noback pass2 @f-6-135 @6-1357
noback pass2 @f-5-135 @5-1357
nofor pass2 @1357 @f-135
nofor pass2 @5-1357 @f-5-135
nofor pass2 @458-1357 @f-458-135
nofor pass2 @458-5-1357 @f-458-5-135

noback pass2 @f-1234 @12347
noback pass2 @f-6-1234 @6-12347
noback pass2 @f-5-1234 @5-12347
nofor pass2 @12347 @f-1234
nofor pass2 @5-12347 @f-5-1234
nofor pass2 @458-12347 @f-458-1234

noback pass2 @f-12345 @123457
noback pass2 @f-6-12345 @6-123457
noback pass2 @f-5-12345 @5-123457
nofor pass2 @123457 @f-12345
nofor pass2 @5-123457 @f-5-12345

noback pass2 @f-1235 @12357
noback pass2 @f-6-1235 @6-12357
noback pass2 @f-5-1235 @5-12357
nofor pass2 @12357 @f-1235
nofor pass2 @5-12357 @f-5-1235
nofor pass2 @458-12357 @f-458-1235

noback pass2 @f-234 @2347
noback pass2 @f-6-234 @6-2347
noback pass2 @f-5-234 @5-2347
nofor pass2 @2347 @f-234
nofor pass2 @5-2347 @f-5-234
nofor pass2 @458-2347 @f-458-234

noback pass2 @f-2345 @23457
noback pass2 @f-6-2345 @6-23457
noback pass2 @f-5-2345 @5-23457
nofor pass2 @23457 @f-2345
nofor pass2 @5-23457 @f-5-2345
nofor pass2 @458-23457 @f-458-2345

noback pass2 @f-136 @1367
noback pass2 @f-6-136 @6-1367
noback pass2 @f-5-136 @5-1367
nofor pass2 @1367 @f-136
nofor pass2 @5-1367 @f-5-136
nofor pass2 @458-1367 @f-458-136
nofor pass2 @458-5-1367 @f-458-5-136
